Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.060

Secretary's authority.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter. Any rules adopted shall be in consultation with the committee;

(2) Establish all licensing, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue licenses to applicants who have met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure and to deny a license to applicants who do not meet the requirements;

(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals licensed under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(6) Administer and supervise the grading and taking of examinations for applicants for licensure;

(7) Determine which states have credentialing requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to individuals credentialed in those states without examinations;

(8) Implement and administer a program for consumer education in consultation with the committee;

(9) Adopt rules implementing a continuing education program in consultation with the committee;

(10) Maintain the official record of all applicants and licensees; and

(11) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

[ 2023 c 175 s 7.]